Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.705.020

Review of implementation—Recommendation.

By December 1, 2014, the state council, created in accordance with RCW 28A.705.010, shall conduct a review of the implementation of the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children and recommend to the state legislature whether Washington should continue to be a member of the compact and whether any other actions should be taken.

[ 2009 c 380 s 9.]